California, session 20252026, AB554.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Protecting Rights, Expanding Prevention, and Advancing Reimbursement for Equity (PrEPARE) Act of 2025.SEC. 2. Section 1342.74 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1342.74. (a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 1342.71, a health care service plan shall not subject antiretroviral drugs, drug devices, or drug products that are medically necessary for the prevention of HIV/AIDS, including preexposure prophylaxis or postexposure prophylaxis, to prior authorization or step therapy, except as provided in paragraph (2).(2) If the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) has approved one or more therapeutic equivalents of a drug, drug device, or drug product for the prevention of HIV/AIDS, this section does not require a health care service plan to cover all of the therapeutically equivalent versions without prior authorization or step therapy, if at least one therapeutically equivalent version is covered without prior authorization or step therapy. For purposes of this section, a long-acting drug, drug device, or drug product is not therapeutically equivalent to a long-acting drug, drug device, or drug product with a different duration.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a health care service plan shall not prohibit, or permit a delegated pharmacy benefit manager to prohibit, a pharmacy provider from dispensing preexposure prophylaxis or postexposure prophylaxis.(c) A health care service plan shall cover preexposure prophylaxis and postexposure prophylaxis that has been furnished by a pharmacist, as authorized in Sections 4052.02 and 4052.03 of the Business and Professions Code, including the pharmacist’s services and related testing ordered by the pharmacist. A health care service plan shall pay or reimburse, consistent with the requirements of this chapter, for the service performed by a pharmacist at an in-network pharmacy or a pharmacist at an out-of-network pharmacy if the health care service plan has an out-of-network pharmacy benefit.(d) This section does not require a health care service plan to cover preexposure prophylaxis or postexposure prophylaxis by a pharmacist at an out-of-network pharmacy, unless in the case of a medical emergency or if the health care service plan has an out-of-network pharmacy benefit.(e) (1) A nongrandfathered health care service plan contract shall provide coverage, and shall not impose any cost sharing, for antiretroviral drugs, drug devices, or drug products that are approved by the FDA for HIV preexposure prophylaxis.(2) A health care service plan shall not impose cost sharing on a nonformulary antiretroviral drug, drug device, or drug product that is approved by the FDA for HIV preexposure prophylaxis and covered pursuant to an exception request if the nonformulary antiretroviral drug, drug device, or drug product is therapeutically equivalent to a formulary antiretroviral drug, drug device, or drug product that is approved by the FDA for HIV preexposure prophylaxis and that is covered by the health care service plan without cost sharing. (f) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), a health care service plan that covers non-self-administered antiretroviral drugs, drug devices, or drug products that are approved by the FDA for the prevention of HIV/AIDS as a medical benefit shall also include those non-self-administered antiretroviral drugs, drug devices, or drug products that are approved by the FDA for the prevention of HIV/AIDS as an outpatient prescription drug benefit. (g) (1) This section does not apply to a specialized health care service plan contract that covers only dental, mental health, or vision benefits or a Medicare supplement contract.(2) This section applies regardless of whether or not an antiretroviral drug, drug device, or drug product is self-administered.(3) This section shall not apply to Medi-Cal managed care plans contracting with the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000), Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), or Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14590) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to the extent that the services described in this section are excluded from coverage under the contract between the Medi-Cal managed care plans and the State Department of Health Care Services.(h) A health care service plan contract that is a high deductible health plan under the definition set forth in Section 223(c)(2) of Title 26 of the United States Code shall comply with the cost-sharing requirements of this section. However, if not applying the minimum annual deductible to an antiretroviral drug, drug device, or drug product would conflict with federal requirements for high deductible health plans, the cost-sharing limits shall apply once a contract’s deductible has been satisfied for the plan year.SEC. 3. Section 10123.1933 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:10123.1933. (a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10123.201, a health insurer shall not subject antiretroviral drugs, drug devices, or drug products that are medically necessary for the prevention of HIV/AIDS, including preexposure prophylaxis or postexposure prophylaxis, to prior authorization or step therapy, except as provided in paragraph (2).(2) If the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) has approved one or more therapeutic equivalents of a drug, drug device, or drug product for the prevention of HIV/AIDS, this section does not require a health insurer to cover all of the therapeutically equivalent versions without prior authorization or step therapy, if at least one therapeutically equivalent version is covered without prior authorization or step therapy. For purposes of this section, a long-acting drug, drug device, or drug product is not therapeutically equivalent to a long-acting drug, drug device, or drug product with a different duration.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a health insurer shall not prohibit, or permit a contracted pharmacy benefit manager to prohibit, a pharmacist from dispensing preexposure prophylaxis or postexposure prophylaxis.(c) A health insurer shall cover preexposure prophylaxis or postexposure prophylaxis that has been furnished by a pharmacist, as authorized in Sections 4052.02 and 4052.03 of the Business and Professions Code, including the pharmacist’s services and related testing ordered by the pharmacist. A health insurer shall pay or reimburse, consistent with the requirements of this chapter, for the service performed by a pharmacist at an in-network pharmacy or a pharmacist at an out-of-network pharmacy if the health insurer has an out-of-network pharmacy benefit.(d) This section does not require a health insurer to cover preexposure prophylaxis or postexposure prophylaxis by a pharmacist at an out-of-network pharmacy, unless in the case of a medical emergency or if the health insurance policy has an out-of-network pharmacy benefit.(e) (1) A nongrandfathered health insurance policy shall provide coverage, and shall not impose any cost sharing, for antiretroviral drugs, drug devices, or drug products that are approved by the FDA for HIV preexposure prophylaxis.(2) A health insurer shall not impose cost sharing on a nonformulary antiretroviral drug, drug device, or drug product that is approved by the FDA for HIV preexposure prophylaxis and covered pursuant to an exception request if the nonformulary antiretroviral drug, drug device, or drug product is therapeutically equivalent to a formulary antiretroviral drug, drug device, or drug product that is approved by the FDA for HIV preexposure prophylaxis and that is covered by the health insurer without cost sharing.(f) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), a health insurer that covers non-self-administered antiretroviral drugs, drug devices, or drug products that are approved by the FDA for the prevention of HIV/AIDS as a medical benefit shall also include those non-self-administered antiretroviral drugs, drug devices, or drug products that are approved by the FDA for the prevention of HIV/AIDS as an outpatient prescription drug benefit.(g) (1) This section does not apply to a specialized health insurance policy that covers only dental, mental health, or vision benefits or a Medicare supplement policy.(2) This section applies regardless of whether or not an antiretroviral drug, drug device, or drug product is self-administered.(h) The department and commissioner may exercise the authority provided by this code and the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to implement and enforce this section. If the commissioner assesses an administrative penalty for a violation, any hearing that is requested by the insurer may be conducted by an administrative law judge of the administrative hearing bureau of the department under the formal procedure of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. This subdivision does not impair or restrict the commissioner’s authority pursuant to another provision of this code or the Administrative Procedure Act.(i) A health insurance policy that is a high deductible health plan under the definition set forth in Section 223(c)(2) of Title 26 of the United States Code shall comply with the cost-sharing requirements of this section. However, if not applying the minimum annual deductible to an antiretroviral drug, drug device, or drug product would conflict with federal requirements for high deductible health plans, the cost-sharing limits shall apply once a policy’s deductible has been satisfied for the plan year.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.